Maine, session 132, LD1793.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §2201-B, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 461, §7, is amended
to read:
4. Eligibility criteria. The department may disburse grants under the program to any
public or private entity demonstrating that a proposed program, project, initiative or activity
is, in the department's determination, likely to increase the diversion of solid waste from
disposal within a particular community, municipality or region or the State, including, but
not limited to, municipal or regional composting, organics recovery or recycling programs,
including the establishment of such programs or the purchase of infrastructure, equipment
or other items necessary to implement such programs or improve existing programs;
programs designed to provide equipment for or otherwise support residential composting
and recycling; programs or business models designed to collect, transport for processing or
process organic or recyclable materials; pilot programs designed to evaluate the feasibility
of targeted composting, organics recovery, recycling or other waste management programs
or initiatives; and initiatives or programs designed to educate certain categories of
individuals or the general public about composting, organics recovery or recycling or to
otherwise improve individual or community waste management practices; and programs,
projects, initiatives or activities relating to the collection and transportation of waste that is
diverted from disposal. Grants disbursed by the department under the program to public
and regional entities may cover necessary costs incidental to or associated with the
implementation of a proposed program, project, initiative or activity, including, but not
limited to, the hiring of or contracting with consultants or specialists, the conducting of
feasibility studies and the promotion of collaborative regional efforts relating to the
collection and transportation of solid waste.
Page 1 - 132LR1794(03)